Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 24 Pawtuxet River Authority

46-24-1.
Definitions.

The term “authority” means the corporation created by §

46-24-2

.

The term “board” means the members of the authority.

The term “participating community” means the towns of Coventry, West Warwick, and Scituate, and the cities of Warwick and Cranston.

The term “project” means the Pawtuxet River authority project.

The term “property” means any or all properties of any public works facilities or part thereof, including plants, works, instrumentalities, incinerators, waste disposal facilities, and all properties used or useful in connection therewith and all parts thereof and all appurtenances thereto, including lands, easements, rights, and lands and water rights, rights of way, contract rights, franchises, approaches, connections, sewer mains, and pipe lines, or any other property incidental to and included in any garbage disposal or incinerator system or part thereof situated within or without the authority’s jurisdiction.

The term “public works” means and include any function which may be performed by any governmental agency, proprietary or otherwise.

The term “treasurer” means the treasurer of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-2.
Pawtuxet River authority created.

A board to be known as the Pawtuxet River authority is hereby created. The board shall be a body corporate and politic, constituting a public benefit corporation, and shall serve as the governing body of the authority for the purposes of this chapter. The powers of the corporation shall be vested in and exercised by the majority of the members of the board hereby created and in office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-3.
Composition of board.

The board shall consist of fifteen (15) members, three (3) members to be appointed by the presidents of the town councils of Coventry, West Warwick, and Scituate, respectively, and three (3) members each to be appointed by the mayors of the cities of Warwick and Cranston. Each member so appointed shall serve for three (3) years beginning on the first day of June, except that in the case of the first members appointed, one from each of the above named participating towns and cities shall serve until June 1, 1973, one until June 1, 1974, and one until June 1, 1975. Members shall be appointed during the month of May of each year by the appointing authority, and in the event of a vacancy occurring in the board by reason of the death, resignation, or otherwise of a member, the appointing authority of the town or city, which appointed the member, shall appoint a new member for the unexpired term.

There shall be minority representation on the board as follows: one of the three (3) members from Warwick and Cranston shall be of the political party other than that of the mayor, and in Coventry, West Warwick, and Scituate, one member each shall be of the political party not having a majority of the members of each respective town council. The mayor or the president of the town council shall appoint to the authority a member or members thereof, to represent the city or town, chosen from lists of qualified electors submitted by the respective chairpersons of the city or town political committee, which lists shall contain the names of five (5) times the number of persons to be appointed. These lists shall be submitted on or before May 1 in the year in which a member is to be appointed for a full term; provided, that in the event of a vacancy by reason of death, resignation, or otherwise, the lists shall be submitted within ten (10) days after the vacancy shall occur; provided, further, that for the initial appointments hereunder, the lists shall be submitted within thirty (30) days after May 1, 1972.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-4.
Compensation of board and agents.

Each member of the board shall receive an annual salary not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year and shall be entitled to reimbursement of his or her actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her official duties. The salaries, compensation, and expenses of all members, officers, employees, and agents shall be paid solely out of the funds of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-5.
Officers and employees of board.

The chairperson of the board shall be selected by the majority vote of the members of the board. The board shall appoint a secretary and treasurer who may, or may not, be members of the board and such other employees as may be necessary in its judgment and fix their compensation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-6.
Business prohibited to members.

No member of the Pawtuxet River authority shall directly or indirectly engage in any contract or agreement for labor, supply of materials for construction, or reconstruction of the physical assets of the district or replacements or additions thereto. No person holding elective office in the participating communities or the general assembly of the state of Rhode Island shall be eligible to be a member of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-7.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of the authority shall be from July 1 to June 30.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-8.
Annual reports.

The board, during May of each year, shall submit to the councils of the participating cities and towns a report showing actual expenditures for the preceding ten (10) months, and the projected expenditures for the final two (2) months of its fiscal year, as well as a proposed budget for the next fiscal year. This annual report shall include, in addition, a request for any necessary contributions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-9.
Powers of authority.

The authority shall the have power:

To negotiate payments within one or more of the participating communities for the conduct of services or the erection of projects necessary for the purposes of the authority, subject to a majority vote of each of the city and town councils participating in each program or project.

To acquire, hold, use, lease, sell, transfer, and dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed, or interest or interests thereon.

To own and operate, maintain, repair, improve, enlarge, and extend, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, any property acquired hereunder, all of which, together with the acquisition of the property, are hereby declared to be public purposes.

To sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of, to any of the participating cities or towns, any property or improvements thereto, which the authority may hereafter acquire or construct; provided, however, that any sale, lease, conveyance, or other disposition of the property shall not prejudice or adversely affect any service which the authority is providing to any other participating city or town.

To sue and be sued.

To adopt and order a corporate seal.

To make bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs, which bylaws may contain provisions indemnifying any person who is or was a member of the authority, in the manner and to the extent provided in §

7-1.2-814

of the Rhode Island Business Corporation Act.

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, including the creation and maintenance of working capital.

To fix rates and collect charges for the use of the facilities of or services rendered by or any commodities furnished by the authority to each of the participating cities or towns, and to pay, as the same shall become due, the expenses of operating and maintaining the properties of the authority.

To contract in its own name for any lawful purpose which would effectuate the provisions of this chapter; to execute all the instruments necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted by this chapter. It is the intention of the legislature that any property acquired by the authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be financed as a self liquidating enterprise, and that any indebtedness incurred by the authority shall be payable solely from the earnings or revenues derived from all or part of the property acquired by the district.

To enter into cooperative agreements with other cities, towns, or public service corporations for the interconnection of public works facilities or for any other lawful corporate purposes necessary and desirable to effect the purposes of this chapter.

In the performance of its functions, the authority is expressly authorized to provide for land and water conservation and for the construction and maintenance of hiking and biking trails, flood control and water pollution control facilities, preservation of wetlands, dam construction, diversion of streams, dikes, walls, and pumping stations, whether or not on its own initiative or by recommendation to the participating communities, and to encourage tax relief for landowners in the construction of facilities for such purposes.

The authority is authorized to apply for, contract for, and expend any federal or state advances or grants or assistance which may be made available for the purposes of this chapter.

The authority shall have all the powers and authority which were previously granted to the Pawtuxet River district commission. All purposes of the Pawtuxet River district commission, including those described in §

46-25-38.1(4)

, shall be established by a vote of the Pawtuxet River authority as created by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 34; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 34.

46-24-10.
Tax exemption.

It is hereby declared that the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state of Rhode Island for the improvement of their health, welfare, and prosperity, and the authority will perform an essential government function in the exercise of the powers conferred by this chapter, and the state of Rhode Island covenants that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments or sums in lieu of taxes, except as provided in §

46-24-11

, to the state or any political subdivision thereof upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision, or upon its activities in the operation and maintenance of the property, or upon any earnings, moneys, revenues, or other income derived by the authority, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-11.
Payments in lieu of taxes.

The authority shall pay annually in lieu of any property tax, as a charge upon its earnings and revenues, to each city, town, and district, or other district, a sum equal in amount to any property tax levied on any property by or on behalf of the town or district during the year next preceding the acquisition of the property by the authority. The authority shall have no power to levy or collect ad valorem property taxes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-12.
Subcommittees.

The board may create such subcommittees as may be necessary to carry out its duties, except that all powers shall be reserved to the entire board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-13.
Meetings.

The board shall meet at least once a month at a place within the participating communities, and all meetings shall be open to the public, and all decisions shall be made public; provided, however, nothing contained herein shall prohibit the board from closing a meeting to the public when the nature of the item under discussion involves personnel or other matters which, in the interest of the public welfare, should remain confidential.

Special meetings may be called by the chairperson upon at least twenty-four (24) hours notice by either regular mail or by telephone or by a majority of the members presenting to the chairperson a petition signed by each of them setting forth the purpose of the meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-14.
Quorum.

The majority of the members of the committee shall be required to transact any business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-15.
Offices.

Upon organization, the authority shall proceed to lease, rent, or buy facilities that are necessary to establish a permanent office which shall be open at reasonable business hours to the public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-16.
Merit system.

The authority is authorized to establish by resolution a personnel merit system for its employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-17.
Money of the authority.

All money of the authority from whatever source derived, shall be paid to the treasurer of the authority. The money on receipt shall be deposited forthwith in a separate bank account or accounts. The money in the account shall be paid out on a check of the treasurer on requisition by the authority, or of such other person or persons as the authority may authorize to make the requisitions. All deposit of the money shall be secured by obligations of the United States or the state of Rhode Island with a market value equal at all times to the amount of deposits, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give securities for any deposits. The authority shall have power as to the custody, collection, security, investment, and payment of any money within its jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 147, § 1.

46-24-18.
Funding of authority’s operations.

The cost of the operation of the authority shall be borne equally by the member towns and cities, and they shall each annually appropriate a sum sufficient to pay its proportionate share of the operation of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-19.
Right to alter, amend, or repeal chapter.

The right to alter, amend, or repeal this chapter is hereby expressly reserved, but no such alteration, amendment, or repeal shall operate to impair the obligation of any contract made by the authority under any power conferred by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.

46-24-20.
Severability.

If any section, clause, provision, or term of this chapter shall be declared unconstitutional and ineffective in whole or in part then, to the extent that it is not unconstitutional and effective, it shall be valid and effective, and no other section, clause, provision, or term shall on account thereof be deemed invalid or ineffective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 111, § 1.